Missouri, session 2026, HB3132.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 314, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto four new sections, to
be known as sections 314.205, 314.208, 314.211, and 314.214, to read as follows:
314.205. As used in sections 314.205 to 314.214, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Certificate", a certificate of exemplary conduct and good moral character;
(2) "Circuit court", any circuit court in the state of Missouri;
(3) "Eligible individual", a person who has been convicted of an offense in this
state or in any other jurisdiction that does not include an offense that would subject a
person to the sex offender registry under sections 589.400 to 589.426;
(4) "Petition", any form or document that is submitted to the circuit court that
documents an eligible individual's desire to obtain a certificate and the eligible
individual's justification for why the circuit court should grant his or her request.
314.208. 1. The circuit court shall have the power to issue a certificate to an
eligible individual that has the force and effect of a final judgment. The circuit court
shall issue a certificate to an eligible individual if the presiding judge finds, at the
moment of sentencing or at any moment thereafter, that clear and convincing evidence
demonstrates that the eligible individual has:
(1) Consistently conducted himself or herself in a manner warranting the
issuance of a certificate;
(2) Consistently demonstrated that he or she is of good moral character; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3132 2
(3) Generally acted in such a way that granting the certificate is consistent with
the public interest.
2. The circuit court shall have the power to investigate an eligible individual
petitioning for a certificate.
3. The circuit court shall grant or deny the petition within a reasonable period of
time after the petition is filed.
4. If the circuit court has issued a certificate, the circuit court may at any time
issue a new certificate enlarging the relief previously granted.
5. After notice to a certificate holder, the circuit court has the power to revoke a
certificate upon a subsequent conviction.
314.211. 1. A certificate shall not prevent any judicial or administrative
proceeding, any licensing authority, or any other body, board, employer, or authority
from accessing or considering the eligible individual's conviction history.
2. A certificate removes any or all bars an eligible individual faces with respect
to employment, housing, or occupational licenses.
3. An employer is not civilly or criminally liable for an act or omission by an
employee who has been issued a certificate, except for a willful or wanton act by the
employer in hiring the employee who has been issued a certificate.
314.214. 1. The chief justice of the Missouri supreme court, or his or her
designee, may create forms to assist eligible individuals in providing all the information
required for a presiding judge to fully consider the eligible individual's case.
2. The division of professional registration, and any other Missouri entity that
has the authority to issue or revoke a license, shall report to the general assembly on
November thirtieth of each year the following:
(1) The number of licensure applicants with felony convictions;
(2) The number of licensure applicants with certificates;
(3) The number of licenses awarded to applicants with felony convictions;
(4) The number of licenses awarded to applicants with certificates;
(5) The number of applicants with felony convictions denied licenses; and
(6) The number of applicants with certificates denied licenses.
✔